Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-371
Exemption from civil liability.

The county and the county treasurer or designated county official and his or her employees or agents shall be exempt from all civil liability when carrying out powers and duties delegated under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 71.